Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 72 Rhode Island Challenge Grants Act
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-72-1.
Short title.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Challenge Grants Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 42, § 1.

16-72-2.
Legislative intent — Capital project.

The legislature recognizes that the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, and the Community College of Rhode Island would be greatly strengthened by the addition of funds for capital improvements which are essential for the maintenance and future development of physical assets. It recognizes that private support in addition to state support is desirable in achieving this goal. It is the intent of the legislature to provide the opportunity to each public institution of higher education in Rhode Island to receive and match challenge grants for capital projects within the university, the college, and the community college. The associated foundations that serve these institutions shall solicit and receive gifts from private sources to provide for matching funds to the challenge grants for the establishment of capital projects.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 42, § 1.

16-72-3.
Allocation and administration of grants — Capital projects.

For the duration of the program, each institution of public higher education shall be eligible to receive one-third (1/3) of the funds estimated to be available by the director of administration. Provided, in no instance shall amounts allocated by the board of governors exceed those estimated to be available by the director of administration. The amount allocated to the institutions by the board of governors for higher education shall be in the following manner: Each institution which raises contributions for capital projects of no less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) each shall receive a matching grant equal to thirty-three percent (33%) of the private contribution for each and every contribution.

For the purposes of determining the amount of a matching grant, multiple grants from a single individual, corporation, or foundation within a twelve (12) month period shall be matched at the total amount of the contribution made for the purposes of this section. Each institution’s foundation shall establish its own Rhode Island capital fund as a depository for private contributions and state matching funds as provided in this section. State matching funds shall be transferred to an institutional foundation upon notification that the institution has received and deposited a proportionate amount specific in this section.

The foundation serving the institution shall have the responsibility for the maintenance and investment of its capital fund and for the administration of the program for the institution. The government board of each foundation shall be responsible for assisting in the solicitation of gifts and for receiving gifts to be used as funds to be deposited and matched within the challenge grants for the establishment of the capital fund for each institution. Each foundation shall include in its annual report to the board of governors for higher education information concerning collection and investment of donations and matching grants of the capital fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 42, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 59.

16-72-4.
Establishment of capital projects.

When the sum of the challenge grant and matching funds for a particular capital project has been deposited into the institutional foundation’s capital fund account, the president of the institution shall recommend to the board of governors for higher education the establishment of a capital project. Upon the approval of the board of governors, the capital project will be established and may be named in honor of a donor, benefactor, or honoree of the institution, at the option of the president.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 42, § 1.